Massachusetts, session 194th, S1477.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 5S, the following section:-
Section 5T. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the
following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
“Disposable Food Container”, a single-use disposable product used in a food service
establishment for serving, transporting or packaging prepared, ready-to-consume or uncooked
food or beverages.
of 3

“Food Establishment”, a business that stores, prepares, packages, serves, vends or
otherwise provides food for human consumption, including but not limited to, any establishment
requiring a permit to operate in accordance with the State Food Code.
“Polystyrene”, a synthetic resin which is a polymer of styrene, used chiefly as lightweight
rigid foams and solid containers.
“Prepared Food”, food or beverage for consumption on the premises of a food
establishment, using any cooking or food preparation technique. This does not include any raw
uncooked meat, fish or eggs unless provided for consumption without further food preparation.
“Retail Establishment”, a commercial business facility that sells goods directly to the
consumer, including but not limited to, grocery stores, pharmacies, liquor stores, convenience
stores, restaurants, retail stores and vendors selling clothing, food and personal items.
(b) Except as provided herein, on or after August 1, 2027, food establishments shall be
prohibited from dispensing food to customers in disposable food service containers made from
polystyrene.
(c) Except as provided herein, on and after August 1, 2027, retail establishments shall be
prohibited from selling or distributing disposable food containers made of polystyrene to
customers.
(d) A food establishment may apply to the health department of the town or city in which
it operates, showing that the conditions of this provision would cause undue hardship. The local
health department or its designee may defer application of this provision for a food establishment
for a one year period. An undue hardship shall mean a situation unique to the food establishment
of 3

where there are no reasonable alternatives to the use of polystyrene disposable food service
containers and compliance with this provision would cause significant economic hardship to that
food establishment.
(e) The commissioner shall promulgate regulations for the enforcement of this section.
Regulations promulgated under this section shall include fines, not to exceed 1,000 dollars, for
any single violation of subsections (b) and (c).
of 3